Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2263.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
New Section 1. The interchange that will be constructed as part of
the K-10 highway expansion project located at the existing at grade
intersection of K-10 highway and Wakarusa drive in Douglas county is
hereby designated as the Kris Norton memorial interchange. Upon
compliance with K.S.A. 68-1,114, and amendments thereto, the
secretary of transportation shall place highway signs along the highway
right-of-way at proper intervals to indicate that the interchange is the
Kris Norton memorial interchange.
New Sec. 2. The portion of K-5 highway from the junction of K-5
highway and north 18th street in Wyandotte county, then west on K-5
highway to the junction of north 38th street is hereby designated as the
Rep Marvin S Robinson memorial highway. Upon compliance with
K.S.A. 68-10,114, and amendments thereto, the secretary of
transportation shall place highway signs along the highway right-of-
way at proper intervals to indicate that the highway is the Rep Marvin S
Robinson memorial highway.
New Sec. 3. The portion of United States highway 160 from the
eastern city limits of Argonia, then east on United States highway 160
to its junction with Eden road is hereby designated as the CPL Monte
Wayne Forrest memorial highway. Upon compliance with K.S.A. 68-
10,114, and amendments thereto, the secretary of transportation shall
place highway signs along the highway right-of-way at proper intervals
to indicate that the highway is the CPL Monte Wayne Forrest memorial
highway.
New Sec. 4. The portion of United States highway 77 from its
junction with interstate 70, then north on United States highway 77 in
Geary county to its western junction with United States highway 24 in
Riley county, then north on United States highway 77 from its eastern
junction with United States highway 24 to the junction with K-16
highway is hereby designated as the POW MIA memorial highway.
Upon compliance with K.S.A. 68-10,114, and amendments thereto, the
secretary of transportation shall place suitable signs along the highway
right-of-way at proper intervals to indicate that the highway is the POW
MIA memorial highway.
New Sec. 5. Bridge No. 82-14-6.88 (026) located on K-82
highway in Clay county is hereby designated as the POW MIA
memorial bridge. Upon compliance with K.S.A. 68-10,114, and
amendments thereto, the secretary of transportation shall place suitable
signs to indicate that such bridge is the POW MIA memorial bridge.
Sec. 6. K.S.A. 68-1037 is hereby amended to read as follows: 68-
1037. Interstate highway 635 where it enters the state on the Kansas-
Missouri line on the north, thence south to the eastern junction with K-
5 highway, thence south from the western junction with K-5 highway to
the junction with Interstate highway 35, is hereby designated as the
Harry Darby memorial highway. The secretary of transportation shall
place markers along the highway right-of-way at proper intervals to
indicate that the highway is the Harry Darby memorial highway. The
secretary of transportation may accept and administer gifts and
donations to aid in obtaining and installing suitable highway signs
bearing the proper approved inscription.

HOUSE BILL No. 2263—page 2
Sec. 7. K.S.A. 68-1037 is hereby repealed.
Sec. 8. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.
I hereby certify that the above BILL originated in the HOUSE, and was
adopted by that body
HOUSE adopted
Conference Committee Report
Speaker of the House.
Chief Clerk of the House.
Passed the SENATE
as amended
SENATE adopted
Conference Committee Report
President of the Senate.
Secretary of the Senate.
APPROVED
Governor.